Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1911
Foreclosure proceedings; decree; order of sale, when issued; limitation.

Upon the expiration of twenty days from and after such decree, the plaintiff shall be entitled to an order of sale of the real property remaining unredeemed. This order of sale shall be issued only at the request of the plaintiff or the holder of an unredeemed lien and shall be issued within ten years from the date of the decree. After ten years from the date of the decree, (1) no order of sale shall issue, (2) the decree shall be deemed satisfied, and (3) no further action shall lie to enforce the lien of any taxes or special assessments included in the decree.

Laws 1943, c. 176, § 11, p. 617;

R.S.1943, § 77-1911;

Laws 1953, c. 281, § 1, p. 912;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 173;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 146.

Procedure contemplates sale of the lands if not redeemed. Madison County v. School Dist. No. 2, 148 Neb. 218, 27 N.W.2d 172 (1947).